src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language pronouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON	PRON-PERS-PL1
+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom:   #  ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
