src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!! --------
!! Pronouns in UNDEFINED language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    Cases   ;
čəd:čəd PRON-PERS-SG1 ;
čəxʷ:čəxʷ PRON-PERS-SG2 ;
čəɬ:čəɬ PRON-PERS-PL1 ;
čələp:čələp PRON-PERS-PL2 ;
əlgʷəˀ:əlgʷəˀ PRON-PERS-PL3 ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
